Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 14
DENVER METROPOLITAN MAJOR LEAGUE
BASEBALL STADIUM DISTRICT

Editor's note:

For a discussion of the difference between service authorities authorized by § 17 of article XIV of the Colorado constitution and statutorily created special districts, see Anema v. Transit Const. Authority, 788 P.2d 1261 (Colo. 1990).

Cross references:

For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution; for the provisions of the "Colorado Baseball Spectator Safety Act of 1993", see § 13-21-120; for the provisions concerning the prohibition on bringing alcoholic beverages or any bottles or cans into the stadium, see § 18-9-123.

Section

32-14-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Denver Metropolitan Major League Baseball Stadium District Act".

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1327, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the location of a major league baseball franchise in the state of Colorado would be a source of recreational entertainment for the residents of the state; that a major league baseball franchise would stimulate economic development throughout the state resulting in increased tourism, the creation and maintenance of new jobs, and the attraction and retention of sports and entertainment events; that, in order to be considered for the location of a major league baseball franchise, it is essential that the mechanism exist for financing and constructing a major league baseball stadium in the Denver metropolitan area; and that the creation of a major league baseball stadium district will promote the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of the state.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1327, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of directors of the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district created by this article.

"Commission" means the Colorado baseball commission created by this article.

"Commissioner" means a member of the commission.

"Director" means a member of the board.

"District" means the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district created by this article.

"Major league baseball" means the organization which controls the administrative functions for the ownership and operation of major league baseball operations in the United States and Canada.

"Major league baseball franchise" means the contractual right granted by major league baseball to any individual, group of individuals, or entity to own and operate a major league baseball team in a specified location.

"Minor league baseball franchise" means the contractual right granted to any individual, group of individuals, or entity to own and operate a minor league baseball team in a specified location.

"Special obligation bonds" means the bonds issued by the district pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-117.

"Stadium" means a sports facility which is designed for use primarily as a major league baseball stadium, which meets the criteria established by the board, which meets criteria which may be established by major league baseball, and which may include, but is not limited to, such features as parking areas, sky boxes, and press boxes which are necessary or desirable for such a sports facility.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1327, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-104. Creation of district - area of district.

There is hereby created a district to be known and designated as the Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district. The district shall be a body corporate and politic and a political subdivision of the state. The area comprising the district shall consist of:

That area comprising the regional transportation district, as specified in section 32-9-106 as it existed on June 2, 1989; and

That area comprising the regional transportation district as specified in sections 32-9-106.3 as it existed on May 25, 1994, 32-9-106.4 as it existed on April 15, 1996, and 32-9-106.6 as it existed on May 25, 1994, unless rejected by the eligible electors as provided in said sections. Except as otherwise provided by law, the area shall not include areas included in the regional transportation district pursuant to section 32-9-106.7.

Each of the directors, officers, and employees of the district shall be a public employee for purposes of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1328, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1517, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1339, § 5, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(1)(b) amended, p. 309, § 5, effective April 15.

L. 99:

(1)(b) amended, p. 420, § 5, effective April 30.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 835, § 8, effective May 14.

32-14-105. Authorizing election.

The board created in section 32-14-106 may submit to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district, at a general election, at a special election not paid for with public funds, or at a primary election for which the additional cost of the ballot question is prepaid and is not paid with public funds, the question of whether, upon the granting of a major league baseball franchise by major league baseball to be located in the district, the district shall be authorized to levy and collect for a period not to exceed twenty years a uniform sales tax throughout the district at a rate not to exceed one-tenth of one percent upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that such sales tax shall be levied on purchases of machinery or machine tools that are otherwise exempt pursuant to section 39-26-709 (1), C.R.S., to the extent that such purchases are subject to the sales tax levied by the regional transportation district pursuant to section 29-2-105 (1)(d), C.R.S., to be held and distributed pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-115.

The board may include, in the question submitted to the registered electors pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, additional information which it deems to be relevant including, but not limited to, a statement that a target amount of fifty percent of the costs of constructing the stadium has been established for the district to attempt to obtain funding through sources of funding other than the sales tax if approved, such as private funding sources and revenues generated from the operation of the stadium.

The board shall decide at which general, primary, or special election the question shall be submitted to the registered electors. The question may be submitted to the registered electors at a special election only if major league baseball decides to grant a major league baseball franchise to be located within the district or to increase the number of major league baseball franchises prior to the next general election and only upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the directors of the board. Such special election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in February, May, September, or December. Notice of the question to be submitted and the general, primary, or special election at which it is to be submitted shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state prior to ninety days before such general, primary, or special election.

Prior to any general, primary, or special election at which the question is to be submitted to the registered electors pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the board shall hold at least two public hearings in each of the counties included, in whole or in part, within the district.

No public moneys from the state, any city, town, city and county, or county shall be expended by the public entity or by any private entity or private person to advertise, promote, or purchase commercial promotion or advertisement to urge electors to vote in favor of or against the question submitted at the election.

If, in any general, primary, or special election, a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district voting on the question vote affirmatively on the question authorizing the district, upon the granting of a major league baseball franchise by major league baseball to be located within the district, to levy and collect for a period not to exceed twenty years the sales tax specified in subsection (1) of this section, then such sales tax shall be levied and collected as provided for in this article.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1328, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

(1), (3), (4), and (6) amended, p. 1517, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1042, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The election detailed in this section concerning the question of authorizing the district to levy and collect a sales tax was held August 14, 1990, and a majority of the registered electors voted affirmatively on the question. The vote count was as follows:

FOR: :u1000 187,710

AGAINST: :u1000 158,283

32-14-106. Board of directors - membership - qualifications.

The district created in section 32-14-104 shall be governed by a board of directors, which consists of seven directors. No director shall be an elected official.

The seven directors shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, for four-year terms. Appointments made to the board while the senate is not in session shall be temporary appointments, and the appointees shall serve on a temporary basis until the senate is in session and is able to confirm such appointments. Each director shall hold office until the director's successor is appointed.

All directors shall have expertise in one or more areas which are relevant to the performance of the powers and duties of the board. Such areas of expertise may include, but are not limited to: Public finance; private finance; commercial law; commercial real estate; real estate development; general contracting; architecture; and administration of baseball operations.

All directors shall reside within the geographical boundaries of the district.

Any director may be removed at any time during the director's term at the pleasure of the governor. If any director vacates the director's office during the term for which appointed to the board, a vacancy on the board exists, and the governor shall fill such vacancy by appointment for the remainder of such unexpired term, subject to confirmation by the senate.

The directors shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among the membership of the board.

All business of the board shall be conducted at regular or special meetings, which shall be held within the geographical boundaries of the district and which shall be open to the public. This subsection (7) and part 4 of article 6 of title 24 apply to all meetings of the board.

Board action shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the total membership of the board.

Directors of the board shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for their necessary expenses while serving as directors of the board.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1329, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 90:

(7) amended, p. 1518, § 3, effective April 16.

L. 91:

(7) amended, p. 821, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), (5), and (7) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 73, § 98, effective February 25.

32-14-107. Board of directors - powers and duties.

In addition to any other powers specifically granted to the board in this article, the board shall have the following powers and duties:

To fix the time and place at which its regular and special meetings shall be held within the geographical boundaries of the district;

To adopt and from time to time amend or repeal rules of procedure and bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state;

To hire such permanent and temporary staff as may be necessary to assist the board in its duties;

To promote the acquisition of a major league baseball franchise and the construction of a stadium within the district;

To sue and be sued;

To decide at which general, primary, or special election the question specified in section 32-14-105 (1) shall be submitted to the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district;

To contract for the construction, equipment, preservation, operation, and maintenance of a stadium and all necessary works incidental thereto;

To enter into such contracts as may be authorized in this article including, but not limited to, contracts for the lease and sale of a stadium;

To enter into and execute all contracts, leases, intergovernmental agreements, and other instruments in writing necessary or proper to the accomplishment of the purposes of this article, including, but not limited to, intergovernmental agreements concerning revenue sharing;

To conduct such investigations and studies as may be necessary in order to evaluate sites within the district which are suitable for the construction of a stadium including, without limitation, a study of major league baseball stadiums in other cities. In connection with such evaluation process, the board shall consult with representatives of any city, town, city and county, or county included, in whole or in part, in the district, the chambers of commerce located within the district, the Denver baseball commission, and any other individuals, groups of individuals, or entities which may provide any relevant expertise concerning the evaluation of stadium sites. In addition, the board shall consult with the urban land institute pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-112 concerning the evaluation of stadium sites.

To establish criteria for a stadium site and a stadium;

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-105, to select a single site within the district for the location of a stadium after consideration of any recommendations made by the urban land institute pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-112 concerning such selection;

To acquire on behalf of the district the selected stadium site and such other lands and interests in real and personal property as may be necessary, by gift, contract, or other means. The board may acquire on behalf of the district such lands and interests in real and personal property as may be necessary for parking facilities, stadium facilities, and stadium site access by gift, contract, or other means or through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, pursuant to the applicable provisions of articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S.; except that the board shall not be authorized to commence an action on behalf of the district to exercise the power of eminent domain after April 30, 1995, and that the board may only exercise the power of eminent domain with respect to real property which is located within the lesser of one thousand feet of the nearest boundary of real property which, as of January 31, 1993, was owned by or under contract to be acquired by the district or to the center line of Blake street or to the center line of 19th street. Any lands and interest in real and personal property acquired by the board through the exercise of the power of eminent domain shall not be sold, leased, rented, or given away except in connection with the sale or lease of the entire stadium; except that this restriction shall not apply to any agreement with the major league baseball franchise which is located in the district.

To maintain an office at such place as it may designate within the geographical boundaries of the district;

To exercise all powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purposes for which the district is organized and capable of being delegated by the general assembly; and no enumeration of particular powers granted shall be construed to impair any general grant of power contained in this article or to limit any such grant to powers of the same class as those so enumerated;

To arrange with the city, town, city and county, or county in which the selected stadium site is located to plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of the selected stadium site, in connection with the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the stadium proposed or being undertaken by the district pursuant to the provisions of this article;

To borrow money, contract to borrow money for the purpose of issuing special obligation bonds, and issue obligations for any of its corporate purposes and to fund such obligations and to refund such obligations as provided in this article;

To engage the services of private consultants and legal counsel to render professional and technical assistance and advice in carrying out the purposes of this article;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets and liability for personal injury to or damage to property of others in such amounts and from such insurers as are necessary and reasonable for governmental entities owning similar facilities in the district;

To procure insurance or guarantees from any public or private entity, including but not limited to the state, any city, town, city and county, or county, or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States of America, for payment of any obligations issued by the district, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance;

To receive and accept from any source aid or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of this article subject to the conditions upon which the grants or contributions are made, including, but not limited to, gifts or grants from the state, any city, town, city and county, or county, and any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States of America for any purpose consistent with the provisions of this article;

To acquire, dispose of, and encumber real and personal property including, without limitation, rights and interests in property, leases, and easements necessary to the functions or the operation of the district;

To fix and from time to time to increase or decrease fees, rentals, rates, tolls, penalties, or other charges for services, programs, or facilities furnished by the district in connection with the operation of the stadium, and the board may pledge such revenues or any portion thereof for the payment of any indebtedness of the district as provided in this article;

To levy and collect a sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this article, and the board may pledge such sales tax revenues or any portion thereof for the payment of any indebtedness of the district;

To invest moneys received by the district pursuant to the provisions of this article in accordance with the provisions of part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To administer and use moneys received by the district in accordance with the provisions of this article;

To develop reporting and review requirements governing the receipt and expenditures of any moneys received by the district pursuant to this article;

To deposit any moneys of the district in any banking institution or savings and loan association within the state as authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and to appoint, for purposes of making such deposits, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district, who may be required to give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board may require.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1330, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

(1)(a), (1)(f), (1)(i), (1)(l), (1)(m), (1)(q), and (1)(s) amended and (1)(bb) added, p. 1518, § 4, effective April 16.

L. 93:

(1)(m) amended, p. 902, § 1, effective May 18.

32-14-108. Conflicts of interest prohibited.

No director, employee, or agent of the district shall be interested in any contract or transaction with the district except in his official representative capacity.

No director may vote in favor of a specific stadium site if such director or any member of the immediate family of such director has any direct or indirect financial interest in the real property on which the stadium would be located or any real property which would be significantly benefited by the construction of a major league baseball stadium.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1332, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-109. Records of board - audits - legislative oversight - powers and duties of state auditor.

All resolutions and orders shall be recorded and authenticated by the signature of the chairman of the board and the secretary. Every legislative act of the board of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution. The book of resolutions and orders shall be a public record. A record shall also be made of all other proceedings of the board, minutes of the meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by directors, employees, and any other agents of the district, and all corporate acts and said record shall be a public record. The board shall keep an account of all moneys received by and disbursed on behalf of the district, and said account shall also be a public record. Any public record of the district shall be open for inspection by any registered elector of the district, by any official representative of the state, or by any official representative of any county, city and county, city, or town included, in whole or in part, within the district. All records shall be subject to audit as provided by law for political subdivisions.

In addition to the audit authorized in subsection (1) of this section, upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the legislative audit committee created pursuant to section 2-3-101, it is the duty of the state auditor to conduct or cause to be conducted audits of the district. The state auditor shall prepare for the committee a report and shall make recommendations on such audit and shall include a copy of or the substance of such report in the annual report made pursuant to section 2-3-103 (2).

In conducting an audit pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the state auditor or his or her designated representative shall have access at all times, except as otherwise provided in sections 39-1-116, 39-4-103, and 39-5-120, C.R.S., to all of the books, accounts, reports, including confidential reports, vouchers, or other records or information of the district. Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall be construed as authorizing or permitting the publication of information prohibited by law. Any director, employee, or agent who fails or who interferes in any way with such examination commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

In verifying any of the audits made, the state auditor shall have the right to ascertain the amounts on deposit in any bank or other depository belonging to the district. In addition, the state auditor shall have the right to audit said account or the books of any such bank or depository. No bank or other depository shall be liable for making available to the state auditor any of the information required pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph (c).

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1332, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2002:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1543, § 290, effective October 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1413, § 105, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-14-110. Privatization - study and consideration.

The board shall study, consider, and pursue opportunities for privatizing the costs of acquiring a stadium site, the costs of constructing a stadium, or the costs of operating a stadium in order to minimize the use of sales tax revenues to the greatest extent possible for the purposes of this article 14. Such methods to be studied, considered, and pursued by the board in order to achieve such privatization shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Financial incentives from private sources, including landowners and developers, available to offset the cost of a stadium site and the construction, maintenance, and operation of a stadium, including, but not limited to: Contributions of money, goods, equipment, and services; financed purchase of an asset agreements; certificate of participation agreements; sale-leaseback agreements; and joint venture proposals;

The sale or lease of the name of the stadium, any symbol or image of the general design, appearance, or configuration of the stadium, including trademarks, service marks, trade names, and logos;

The sale or lease of seat rights;

The sale or lease of luxury suites, commonly referred to as sky boxes; and

The sale of long-term advertising, parking, and concession rights.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1333, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(e) amended, p. 1519, § 5, effective April 16.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2055, § 70, effective July 1.

32-14-111. Criteria - stadium site - stadium.

The board shall establish criteria for the stadium site and the stadium. In establishing such criteria, the board shall consider factors which it deems relevant including, but not limited to:

The need for access to the site by motor vehicles, pedestrians, and others using the stadium, including the proximity to highways, the capacity of surrounding streets and highways to handle traffic, the proximity to actual and proposed public transportation, and the overall convenience to the citizens of the district;

The extent to which financial incentives from private sources, including landowners and developers, may be maximized in order to reduce the amount of public moneys required to be expended for a stadium site;

The extent to which the economic potential resulting from the location of a stadium may be maximized, including the compatibility of a stadium with adjacent actual or proposed development;

The compatibility of a stadium with surrounding neighborhoods;

The existence of readily available fire and police protection services;

The existence or the potential for the existence of adequate parking facilities for motor vehicles in the immediately surrounding area; and

Any criteria which may be established by major league baseball concerning stadium sites or stadiums.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1333, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-112. Consultation with urban land institute - Colorado baseball commission - consideration of recommendations.

The board shall consult with and shall consider any recommendations made by the urban land institute or by the Colorado baseball commission in regard to the duties of the board, including but not limited to the selection of a stadium site, the planning and design of the stadium, and the financing of the stadium site acquisition and the construction of the stadium.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1334, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-113. Costs - acquisition of stadium site - construction of stadium - use of public moneys - target percentage.

The district shall make every reasonable effort to obtain funding for a target amount of at least fifty percent of the total costs incurred by the district in the acquisition of a stadium site and in the construction of a stadium from moneys acquired from sources other than the levy and collection of the sales tax authorized pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-114. Such amount constitutes a target which the district shall attempt to achieve but is not a mandatory requirement. Such moneys may include, but are not limited to, private donations or the revenues acquired by the issuance of special obligation bonds to be paid from the financial incentives specified in section 32-14-110 (1)(a) or the operating revenues generated by the district. The sales tax authorized in section 32-14-114 shall be levied only for the period of time for which it is necessary to generate revenues sufficient to pay the percentage of the total costs incurred in said acquisition and construction not funded by other sources of money and for such other purposes specified in section 32-14-115, but such period of time shall not exceed twenty years.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1334, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1520, § 6, effective April 16.

32-14-114. Sales tax imposed - collection - administration of tax - discontinuance.

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-105 and upon the granting of a major league baseball franchise by major league baseball to be located in the district, the board shall have the power to levy such uniform sales tax for a period not to exceed twenty years throughout the district created in section 32-14-104 upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.; except that such sales tax shall not be levied on the sale of cigarettes and shall be levied on:

Purchases of machinery or machine tools that are otherwise exempt pursuant to section 39-26-709 (1), C.R.S., to the extent that such sales and purchases are subject to the sales tax levied by the regional transportation district pursuant to section 29-2-105 (1)(d), C.R.S., on and after the January 1 following the adoption of a resolution by the board;

Sales of low-emitting motor vehicles, power sources, or parts used for converting such power sources as specified in section 39-26-719 (1), C.R.S.; and

Vending machine sales of food that are otherwise exempt pursuant to section 39-26-714 (2), C.R.S.

The collection, administration, and enforcement of the sales tax shall be performed by the executive director of the department of revenue in the same manner as that for the collection, administration, and enforcement of the state sales tax imposed pursuant to article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., including, without limitation, the retention by a vendor of the percentage of the amount remitted to cover the vendor's expense in the collection and remittance of the sales tax as provided in section 39-26-105, C.R.S. The executive director shall make monthly distributions of such sales tax collections to the district. The district shall pay the net incremental cost incurred by the department of revenue in the administration and collection of such sales tax; except that in no event shall the district pay in any given fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 1994, more than an amount equal to the amount paid by the district in the 1993-94 fiscal year, as adjusted in accordance with changes in the consumer price index for the Denver-Boulder consolidated metropolitan statistical area. The department may make expenditures for such costs subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly.

A qualified purchaser may provide a direct payment permit number issued pursuant to section 39-26-103.5, C.R.S., to any vendor or retailer that is liable and responsible for collecting and remitting any sales tax levied on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this article. A vendor or retailer that has received in good faith from a qualified purchaser a direct payment permit number shall not be liable or responsible for collection and remittance of any sales tax imposed on such sale that is paid for directly from such qualified purchaser's funds and not the personal funds of any individual.

A qualified purchaser that provides a direct payment permit number to a vendor or retailer shall be liable and responsible for the amount of sales tax levied on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this article in the same manner as liability would be imposed on a qualified purchaser for state sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-105 (3), C.R.S.

If the board levies such uniform sales tax as authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall transmit to the executive director of the department of revenue not later than five days after the adoption of the resolution imposing such sales tax a certified copy of said resolution, whereupon said executive director shall proceed to collect, administer, and enforce such sales tax pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section for a period of twenty years from the effective date of said resolution, unless the executive director of the department of revenue receives from the board notification of discontinuance of the levy of such sales tax pursuant to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

At such time, prior to the end of the twenty-year period, that the board determines that the levy of the sales tax is no longer necessary for the purposes set forth in this article, the board shall transmit to the executive director of the department of revenue not later than five days after the adoption of the resolution discontinuing the levy of such sales tax a certified copy of said resolution, whereupon said executive director shall discontinue the collection, administration, and enforcement of said sales tax on the January 1 following the adoption of said resolution. Upon the adoption of said resolution discontinuing the sales tax levy, the board shall have no further authority to levy such sales tax on and after the January 1 following the adoption of said resolution.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1334, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1520, § 7, effective April 16.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 319, § 7, effective March 29.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 983, § 7, effective May 28; (1) amended, p. 1358, § 8, effective January 1, 2000; (2) amended, p. 15, § 9, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1042, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (HB 09-1342), ch. 354, p. 1849, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 99-1015 and House Bill 99-1271 were harmonized.

32-14-115. Sales tax revenues - use.

Sales tax revenues levied and collected pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-114 shall be used by the board for the following purposes:

To reimburse the board for the day-to-day operating costs incurred in the administration of the district; however, such costs shall not exceed three-fourths of one percent of the amount of sales tax revenues collected annually;

To reimburse the board for any loans made to the board or any direct out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the board for matters directly related to the duties of the board prior to the time that sales tax revenues were available for use by the board;

To reimburse the board for expenses incurred in the investigation, study, and evaluation of potential stadium sites, for preconstruction planning of the design and construction of a stadium, and for the hiring of professionals to assist in these and other related activities;

To acquire a site within the district which shall be suitable for construction of a stadium;

To plan, design, and construct a stadium and all facilities incidental thereto;

To pay the principal, interest, and prepayment premium, if any, on outstanding special obligation bonds issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article.

If sales tax revenues levied and collected pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-114 and the operating revenues generated by the district are insufficient for all of the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the purpose set forth in paragraph (f) of said subsection (1) shall have first priority of such sales tax revenues.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1335, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1521, § 8, effective April 16.

32-14-116. Operating revenues - use.

Any operating revenues generated by the district, including, but not limited to, lease payments, fees, rentals, rates, tolls, penalties, and charges for services, programs, or facilities furnished by the district, shall be used by the board for the following purposes:

To pay for the expenses incurred by the board in the general operation of the stadium;

To provide for the repair and maintenance of the stadium;

To provide for capital improvements to the stadium;

To pay the principal, interest, and prepayment premium, if any, on outstanding special obligation bonds issued by the board pursuant to the provisions of this article.

If operating revenues and sales tax revenues are insufficient for all of the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the purpose set forth in paragraph (d) of said subsection (1) shall have first priority of such operating revenues if such operating revenues are pledged to secure the payment of the special obligation bonds.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1336, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1521, § 9, effective April 16.